Nevada, session 83, AB466.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 691D.330 is hereby amended to read as
follows:
691D.330 Notwithstanding any other provision of law:
1. Except as otherwise provided in this section, an insurer that
issues a policy of portable electronics insurance may not terminate
the policy before the expiration of the agreed term of the policy
unless, not less than 30 days before the effective date of the
termination, the insurer provides notice to:
(a) The holder of the policy of portable electronics insurance;
and
(b) If the policy is a group policy issued to a vendor under
which individual customers may elect to enroll for coverage, each
enrolled customer.
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 2 –
2. If the insurer changes a term or condition of a policy of
portable electronics insurance, the insurer shall, not less than 30
days before the effective date of the change, provide:
(a) The policyholder with a revised policy or endorsement; and
(b) Each enrolled customer with a revised certificate of
coverage, endorsement, brochure or other evidence of coverage
which:
(1) Declares that the insurer has changed a term or condition
of the policy which may affect the enrolled customer’s coverage;
and
(2) Provides a summary of the material changes.
3. An insurer may terminate an enrolled customer’s coverage
under a vendor’s policy of portable electronics insurance upon the
discovery of fraud or material misrepresentation by the enrolled
customer in obtaining the coverage or in presenting a claim
thereunder if the insurer provides notice of the termination to the
vendor and the enrolled customer within 10 days after discovery of
the fraud or material misrepresentation.
4. An insurer may immediately terminate an enrolled
customer’s coverage under a vendor’s policy of portable electronics
insurance if the enrolled customer:
(a) Fails to pay a premium;
(b) Ceases to have an active service with the vendor; or
(c) Exhausts the aggregate limit of liability, if any, under the
terms of the policy of portable electronics insurance and the insurer
provides notice of termination to the customer within 30 calendar
days after exhaustion of the limit. If the insurer fails to provide
timely notice as required by this paragraph, the enrolled customer’s
coverage under the policy continues until the insurer provides notice
of termination to the enrolled customer notwithstanding the
exhaustion of the aggregate limit of liability.
5. A vendor or other holder of a group policy of portable
electronics insurance shall not terminate the policy unless, not less
than 30 days before the effective date of the termination, the insurer
provides notice to each enrolled customer of the termination of the
policy and the effective date of termination. An insurer may
authorize a vendor to provide notice to an enrolled customer on
behalf of the insurer pursuant to this subsection.
6. Any notice that is required pursuant to this section must be
in writing and be:
(a) Mailed or delivered to the enrolled customer, vendor or other
policyholder at his or her last known address; or
-
83rd Session (2025)

– 3 –
(b) [Sent] Except as otherwise provided in NRS 680A.560, sent
by electronic mail or other electronic means [in accordance with
regulations adopted by the Commissioner] to the enrolled customer,
vendor or other policyholder at the electronic mail address of the
enrolled customer, vendor or other policyholder last known by the
insurer.
 An insurer or vendor who provides notice pursuant to this
subsection must maintain proof of mailing or delivery in a form
authorized or accepted by the United States Postal Service or other
commercial mail delivery service or an electronic record or other
proof that the notice was sent.
20 ~~~~~ 25
-
83rd Session (2025)